Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1515.01
Third-party claim, defined.

Third-party claim shall mean a final judgment against a responsible person obtained by a third party for compensation for bodily injury and property damage caused by a release first reported after January 1, 1990.

Laws 1991, LB 409, § 8.